Hawaii statutes.
[§89E-3] Special retirement benefit.
(a) Notwithstanding section 88-99 or any other law to the contrary, the
employees' retirement system may provide, regardless of whether the actuarial
value of the system's assets is one hundred per cent of the system's actuarial
accrued liability, the benefits authorized under this section. Any employee
who receives official notification that the employee's position is being
abolished or who is directly affected by a reduction-in-force or workforce
restructuring plan, including privatization, proposed by an agency may elect,
if the employee is eligible to receive benefits from the employees' retirement
system and meets any of the criteria specified in subsection (c), the special
retirement benefit provided by this section in lieu of exercising any
reduction-in-force rights under chapter 89 and in lieu of receiving any severance
benefits under section 89E‑2. To receive the special retirement benefit
offered under this section, the employee shall comply with the application and
time frame requirements specified in subsection (b).

(b) Any employee who elects to retire and
receive the special retirement benefit under this section shall notify the
employee's employing agency and file a formal application for retirement with
the employees' retirement system not less than thirty days or more than one
hundred fifty days prior to the date of retirement.

(c) Notwithstanding the age and length of
service requirements of sections 88-73, 88-281, and 88-331, an employee shall
qualify for the special retirement benefit if, on the employee's retirement
date, the employee meets any one of the following criteria:

(1) Has at least five years of credited service as a
contributory class A or B member and is at least fifty years of age;

(2) Has at least twenty years of credited service as
a contributory class A or B member, irrespective of age;

(3) Has at least ten years of credited service as a
noncontributory class C member and is at least fifty-seven years of age;

(4) Has at least twenty-five years of credited
service as a noncontributory class C member, irrespective of age;

(5) A class H member who became a member prior to
July 1, 2012, has at least five years of credited service[,] and is at least
fifty-seven years of age;

(6) A class H member who became a member prior to
July 1, 2012, and has at least twenty-five years of credited service,
irrespective of age;

(7) A class H member who became a member after June
30, 2012, has at least ten years of credited service[,] and is at least sixty
years of age; or

(8) A class H member who became a member after June
30, 2012, has at least twenty-five years of credited service[,] and is at least
fifty-five years of age.

(d) Any employee who exercises the option of
the special retirement benefit under this section because the employee does not
qualify with respect to the age and length of service requirements under
section 88-73, 88-281, or 88-331, to receive a retirement benefit without
penalty, shall not have the retirement benefit reduced in accordance with the
actuarial formula normally used by the employees' retirement system for the
calculation of early retirement benefits.

(e) The head of the agency shall transmit a
list of employees who elected and received the special retirement benefit to
the board of trustees of the employees' retirement system not less than thirty
days but not more than one hundred fifty days prior to the employee's
retirement date. The head of the agency shall certify that the employees on
the list have in fact selected the special retirement benefit in lieu of
receiving the severance benefit under section 89E-2 and exercising any
reduction-in-force rights under chapter 89.

(f) The board of trustees of the employees'
retirement system shall make payments with respect to all eligible employees
who retire pursuant to this section. The board shall determine the portion of
the additional actuarial present value of benefits to be charged to the State
based upon retirements authorized under this section. If necessary, the State
shall make additional payments to the employees' retirement system in the
amounts required to amortize the additional actuarial present value of benefits
over a period of five years. The unfunded actuarial present values of benefits
payable under this section shall be considered part of the unfunded accrued
liability of the employees' retirement system under sections 88‑122 and
88-123. [L Sp 2016 2d, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next